Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3.02. Quarantine and Isolation of Persons with Communicable Diseases of Public Health Threat.
§ 32.1-48.013.
Appeal of any order of isolation.

Any person or persons subject to an order of isolation or a court-ordered confirmation or extension of any such order pursuant to this article may file an appeal of the order of isolation in the circuit court for the city or county in which such person or persons reside or are located or, in the case of an affected area, in the circuit court for any affected jurisdiction or jurisdictions. Any petition for appeal shall be in writing, shall set forth the grounds on which the order of isolation is being challenged vis-a-vis the subject person or persons or affected area, and shall be served upon the State Health Commissioner or his legal representative.

A hearing on the appeal of the order of isolation shall be held within 48 hours of the filing of the petition for appeal or, if the 48-hour period terminates on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the hearing shall be held on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or day on which the court is lawfully closed.In extraordinary circumstances, for good cause shown, the Commissioner may request a continuance of the hearing, which the court shall only grant after giving due regard to the rights of the affected individuals, the protection of the public health and safety, the severity of the emergency, and the availability of witnesses and evidence.

Any person appealing an order of isolation shall have the burden of proving that he is not properly the subject of the order of isolation.

An appeal shall not stay any order of isolation.

Upon receiving multiple appeals of an order of isolation, the court may, on the motion of any party or on the court’s own motion, consolidate the cases in a single proceeding for all appeals when (i) there are common questions of law or fact relating to the individual claims or rights to be determined; (ii) the claims of the consolidated cases are substantially similar; and (iii) all parties to the appeals will be adequately represented in the consolidation.

The circuit court shall not conduct a de novo review of the order of isolation; however, the court shall consider the existing record and such supplemental evidence as the court shall consider relevant. The court shall conduct the hearing on an appeal of an order of isolation in a manner that will protect the health and safety of court personnel, counsels, witnesses, and the general public and in accordance with rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia pursuant to subsection C of §

17.1-503

. The court may, for good cause shown, hold all or any portion of the hearings in camera upon motion of any party or the court’s own motion.

Upon completion of the hearing, the court may (i) vacate or modify the order of isolation as such order applies to any person who filed the appeal and who is not, according to the record and the supplemental evidence, appropriately subject to the order of isolation; (ii) vacate or modify the order of isolation as such order applies to all persons who filed an appeal and who are not, according to the record and the supplemental evidence, appropriately subject to the order of isolation; (iii) confirm the order of isolation as it applies to any person or all appealing parties upon a finding that such person or persons are appropriately subject to the order of isolation and that isolation is being implemented in the least restrictive environment to address the public health threat effectively, given the reasonably available information on effective infection control measures and the nature of the communicable disease of public health threat; or (iv) confirm the order of isolation as it applies to all persons subject to the order upon finding that all such persons are appropriately subject to the order of isolation and that isolation is being implemented in the least restrictive environment to address the public health threat effectively given the reasonably available information on effective control measures and the nature of the communicable disease of public health threat.In any case in which the court shall vacate the order of isolation as it applies to any person who has filed a request for review of such order and who is subject to such order or as it applies to all persons seeking judicial review who are subject to such order, the person or persons shall be immediately released from isolation unless such order to vacate the isolation shall be stayed by the filing of an appeal to the Court of Appeals. Any party to the case may file an appeal of the circuit court decisions to the Court of Appeals. Parties to the case shall include any person who is subject to an order of isolation and has filed an appeal of such order with the circuit court and the State Health Commissioner.

Appeals of any final order of any circuit court regarding the State Health Commissioner’s petition for review and confirmation or extension of an order of isolation or any appeal of an order of isolation by a person or persons who are subject to such order shall be appealable to the Court of Appeals, with an expedited review in accordance with the rules of the court pursuant to subsection C of §

17.1-503

.

Appeals of any circuit court order relating to an order of isolation shall not stay any order of isolation.

Persons appealing any order of isolation shall have the right to be represented by an attorney in all proceedings. If the person is unable to afford an attorney, counsel shall be appointed for the person by the circuit court for the jurisdiction in which the person or persons who are subject to the order of isolation reside or, in the case of an affected area, by the circuit court for the jurisdiction or jurisdictions for the affected area. Counsel so appointed shall be paid at a rate established by the Supreme Court of Virginia from the Commonwealth’s criminal fund.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2007, cc. 699, 783; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 699 and 783 are identical, and inserted “are located or” in subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, in subsections G and H, substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Supreme Court of Virginia”; and in subsection H, deleted “directly” following “appealable.”

Cross references.

As to appeal of orders relating to quarantine or isolation of persons to the Virginia Supreme Court, see Rule 5:41, Rules of the Virginia Supreme Court.

§ 32.1-48.013:1.
Electronic filings as protection from communicable disease.

Notwithstanding Rule 1:17 of the Supreme Court of Virginia, a court in its discretion may permit the electronic or facsimile filing of a petition, notice, brief, notice of appeal, or other legal document when such filing is necessary to expedite the proceedings or to protect the public, court officials, or others participating in the proceedings from exposure to a communicable disease.

History.

2007, cc. 699, 783.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 32.1-48.014.
Enforcement of orders of quarantine or isolation; penalties.

Any person who does not comply with a validly issued order of quarantine or order of isolation issued or prepared pursuant to this article shall be subject to the penalties provided in §

32.1-27

, including, upon conviction, a Class 1 misdemeanor and payment of civil penalties.

Any order of quarantine or isolation shall be enforced by law-enforcement agencies, as directed by the State Health Commissioner. Any enforcement authority directed to law-enforcement agencies by the Commissioner shall expressly include, but need not be limited to, the power to detain or arrest any person or persons identified as in violation of any order of quarantine or isolation, or for whom probable cause exists that he may fail or refuse to comply with any such order.Any person or persons so detained shall be held in the least restrictive environment that can provide any required health care or other services for such person.

Every attorney for the Commonwealth shall have the duty to prosecute, without delay, any violation of this chapter in accordance with the penalties set forth in §

32.1-27

.

Pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 264 et seq. and 42 C.F.R. Parts 70 and 71, any order of quarantine or isolation issued by the Director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention affecting the Commonwealth or the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority may be enforced by local law-enforcement officers or officers of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority with jurisdiction over the facility involved in the quarantine or isolation order.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2007, cc. 699, 783.

Cross references.

As to authority of police officers to deliver, serve, execute, and enforce orders of isolation and quarantine, see §

15.2-1704

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 699 and 783 are identical, and rewrote the first paragraph of subsection B; deleted subsection C, pertaining to enforcement of an order of quarantine or isolation, and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and added present subsection D.

§ 32.1-48.015.
Authorization to disclose health records.

The provisions of this article are hereby declared to be necessary to prevent serious harm and serious threats to the health and safety of individuals and the public in Virginia for purposes of authorizing the State Health Commissioner or his designee to examine and review any health records of any person or persons subject to any order of quarantine or order of isolation pursuant to this article and the regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services promulgated in compliance with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, as amended. The State Health Commissioner shall authorize any designee in writing to so examine and review any health records of any person or persons subject to any order of quarantine or order of isolation pursuant to this article.

Pursuant to the regulations concerning patient privacy promulgated by the federal Department of Health and Human Services, covered entities may disclose protected health information to the State Health Commissioner or his designee without obtaining consent or authorization for such disclosure from the person who is the subject of the records. Such protected health information shall be used to facilitate the health care of any person or persons who are subject to an order of quarantine or an order of isolation. The State Health Commissioner or his designee shall only redisclose such protected health information in compliance with the aforementioned federal regulations. Further, the protected health information disclosed to the State Health Commissioner or his designee shall be held confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 12 of §

2.2-3705.5

.

Pursuant to subsection G of §

32.1-116.3

, any person requesting or requiring any employee of a public safety agency as defined in subsection M of §

32.1-45.2

to arrest, transfer, or otherwise exercise custodial supervision over an individual known to the requesting person (i) to be infected with any communicable disease or (ii) to be subject to an order of quarantine or an order of isolation pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of Chapter 2 shall inform such employee of a public safety agency of the potential risk of exposure to a communicable disease.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2007, cc. 699, 783; 2017, c. 778; 2020, c. 502.

Editor’s note.

The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, referred to in subsection A above, is codified generally as 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 699 and 783 are identical, and added subsection C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 12 of §

2.2-3705.5

” for “subdivision 17 of §

2.2-3705.5

” in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 502 substituted “subsection M” for “subsection J” in subsection C.

§ 32.1-48.016.
Immunity from liability.

Any person, including a person who serves in a Medical Reserve Corps (MRC) unit or on a Community Emergency Response Team (CERT), who, in good faith and in the performance of his duties, acts in compliance with this article and the Board of Health’s regulations shall not be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission resulting from such actions unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2005, c. 474.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 474 inserted “including a person who serves in a Medical Reserve Corps (MRC) unit or on a Community Emergency Response Team (CERT).”

§ 32.1-48.017.
Use of public or private property or facilities.

Upon the declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency pursuant to §

44-146.17

, the State Health Commissioner, acting in concert with the Governor, shall be authorized to require the use of any public or private property, building or facility to implement any order of quarantine or order of isolation. The State Health Commissioner and the Governor shall find, together, that the use of the property, building or facility is necessary and appropriate to enforce an order of quarantine or an order of isolation in the least restrictive environment.

If the Commissioner and the Governor elect to use any public or private property, building or facility pursuant to this article and this section, the Commissioner shall make accommodations, in conjunction with the owner or operator of the property, building or facility, for persons who are employed in, using or occupying the property, building or facility and who are not covered by the relevant order of quarantine or order of isolation.

Owners or operators of any property, building or facility so commandeered shall be entitled to compensation.

History.

2004, cc. 773, 1021.